Maryland, session 2025, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–1414.
(d) (5) A person alleged to be liable receiving the citation for a toll violation
under this section may:
(i) Pay the video toll and the civil penalty directly to the Authority;
[or]
(II) REQUEST TO PAY THE VIDEO TOLL AND CIVIL PENALTY
THROUGH THE INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PLAN UNDER § 21–1417 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; OR
[(ii)] (III) Elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.
– 1 –

Ch. 527 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) (i) If the person alleged to be liable under this section fails to elect
to stand trial or TO APPEAR AT TRIAL AFTER HAVING ELECTED TO STAND TRIAL,
FAILS to pay the prescribed video toll and civil penalty within 30 days after mailing of the
citation OR IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN
APPROVED BY THE AUTHORITY, or is adjudicated to be liable after trial, [or fails to
appear at trial after having elected to stand trial,] the Authority or its duly authorized
agent may:
1. Collect the video toll and the civil penalty by any means of
collection as provided by law; and
2. Notify the Administration of the failure to pay the video
toll and civil penalty in accordance with subsection (i) of this section.
(ii) No additional hearing or proceeding is required before the
Administration takes action with respect to the motor vehicle of the registered owner under
subsection (i) of this section.
(h) (2) The Authority may recall a delinquent account from the Central
Collection Unit if:
(i) The delinquent account exceeds $300 in unpaid video tolls and
associated civil penalties;
(ii) The video tolls in question were assessed within a 30–day period;
[and] OR
(iii) Mitigating factors exist with respect to the assessment of the
unpaid video tolls and associated civil penalties, as determined by the Authority; AND
(IV) THE AUTHORITY APPROVES AN INCOME–BASED
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN FOR A DELINQUENT ACCOUNT.
21–1417.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PAYMENT
PLAN PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) “VIDEO TOLL” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–1414 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 527
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PLAN PROGRAM.
(C) A PERSON THAT ACCUMULATES UNPAID VIDEO TOLLS AND CIVIL
PENALTIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OF AT LEAST $250 $300 MAY APPLY TO
PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(D) IF A PERSON ENTERS INTO AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PAYMENT
PLAN UNDER THIS SECTION AND FAILS TO PAY THE OUTSTANDING VIDEO TOLLS AND
CIVIL PENALTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PAYMENT PLAN, THE AUTHORITY MAY
REFER THE AMOUNT OF THE UNPAID VIDEO TOLLS AND CIVIL PENALTIES TO THE
CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT.
(E) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH:
(1) INCOME ELIGIBILITY ELIGIBILITY AND VERIFICATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE PROGRAM;
(2) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF INSTALLMENT PAYMENT OPTIONS
AVAILABLE UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(3) AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM;
(4) A PROCESS FOR REPORTING A PERSON WHO FAILS TO MAKE
REQUIRED INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS IN A TIMELY MANNER IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE PERSON’S PAYMENT PLAN; AND
(5) ANY OTHER REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM.
26–201.
(c) A traffic citation issued to a person under this section shall contain:
(1) (i) A notice in boldface type that, if the citation is a payable
violation:
1. The person must comply with one of the following within
30 days after receipt of the citation:
A. Pay the full amount of the preset fine;
– 3 –

Ch. 527 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. Enter into a payment plan under § 7–504.1 of the Courts
Article, if the defendant has at least $150 in total outstanding fines and is otherwise
qualified to enter into a payment plan;
C. ENTER INTO AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PLAN UNDER § 27–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, IF THE DEFENDANT HAS AT
LEAST $250 IN TOTAL OUTSTANDING FINES AND IS OTHERWISE QUALIFIED TO
ENTER INTO AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN;
D. Request a hearing regarding sentencing and disposition in
lieu of a trial as provided in § 26–204(b)(2) of this subtitle; or
[D.] E. Request a trial date at the date, time, and place
established by the District Court by writ or trial notice; and
2. A. If the person fails to comply within 30 days after
receipt of the citation, the Administration will be notified and may take action to suspend
the person’s driver’s license; and
B. Driving on a suspended license is a criminal offense for
which the person could be incarcerated; or
(ii) If the citation is for a must–appear violation, a notice that:
1. The citation is a summons to appear as notified by a circuit
court or the District Court through a trial notice setting the date, time, and place for the
person to appear; or
2. A circuit court or the District Court will issue a writ
setting the date, time, and place for the person to appear;
(d) If a citation is marked “you have the right to stand trial”:
(1) The form of the defendant’s copy of the citation shall include in boldface
type a description of the following options:
(i) Payment of the fine;
(ii) Enter into a payment plan under § 7–504.1 of the Courts Article,
if the defendant has at least $150 in total outstanding fines and is otherwise qualified to
enter into a payment plan;
(III) ENTER INTO AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PAYMENT
PLAN UNDER § 27–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, IF THE DEFENDANT HAS AT LEAST $250
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 527
IN TOTAL OUTSTANDING FINES AND IS OTHERWISE QUALIFIED TO ENTER INTO AN
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN;
[(iii)] (IV) Request a trial; and
[(iv)] (V) Request a “guilty with an explanation” hearing regarding
sentencing and disposition in lieu of a trial; and
27–103.
(a) If a person fined under the Maryland Vehicle Law does not pay the fine or
enter into a payment plan under § 7–504.1 of the Courts Article OR § 27–103.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, the court may:
(1) Refer the amount of the unpaid outstanding fine to the Central
Collection Unit of the Department of Budget and Management; or
(2) Process the unpaid outstanding fine as it would otherwise process
outstanding fines owed the court.
27–103.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE INCOME–BASED
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN INCOME–BASED
INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN PROGRAM.
(C) A PERSON THAT ACCUMULATES AT LEAST $250 OF FINES FOR
VIOLATIONS OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW MAY APPLY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PROGRAM.
(D) IF A PERSON ENTERS INTO AN INCOME–BASED INSTALLMENT PAYMENT
PLAN UNDER THIS SECTION AND FAILS TO PAY THE OUTSTANDING FINES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE PAYMENT PLAN, THE DEPARTMENT MAY REFER THE
AMOUNT OF THE UNPAID OUTSTANDING FINES TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT
OF THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH:
(1) INCOME ELIGIBILITY AND VERIFICATION REQUIREMENTS FOR
THE PROGRAM;
– 5 –

Ch. 527 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF INSTALLMENT PAYMENT OPTIONS
AVAILABLE UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(3) AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE
PROGRAM;
(4) A PROCESS FOR REPORTING A PERSON WHO FAILS TO MAKE
REQUIRED INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS IN A TIMELY MANNER IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THE PERSON’S PAYMENT PLAN; AND
(5) ANY OTHER REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 6 –